Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB106.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.7874 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 164.7871 to 164.7885:
(1) "Academic term" means a semester or other time period specified in an
administrative regulation promulgated by the authority;
(2) "Academic year" means a period consisting of at least the minimum school term, as
defined in KRS 158.070;
(3) "ACT score" means the composite score achieved on the American College Test at
a national test site on a national test date or the college admissions examination
administered statewide under KRS 158.6453(5)(b)5. if the exam is the ACT, or an
equivalent score, as determined by the authority, on the SAT administered by the
College Board, Inc.;
(4) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(5) "Award period" means the fall and spring consecutive academic terms within one
(1) academic year;
(6) "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education created under KRS
164.011;
(7) "Eligible high school student" means any person who:
(a) Is a citizen, national, or permanent resident of the United States and Kentucky
resident;
(b) Was enrolled after July 1, 1998:
1. In a Kentucky high school for at least one hundred forty (140) days of
the minimum school term unless exempted by the authority's executive
director upon documentation of extreme hardship, while meeting the
KEES curriculum requirements, and was enrolled in a Kentucky high
school at the end of the academic year;
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/16/2026 9:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1837
2. In a Kentucky high school for the fall academic term of the senior year
and who:
a. Was enrolled during the entire academic term;
b. Completed the high school's graduation requirements during the
fall academic term; and
c. Was not enrolled in a secondary school during any other academic
term of that academic year; or
3. In the Gatton Academy of Mathematics and Science in Kentucky, the
Craft Academy for Excellence in Science and Mathematics, or in high
school at a model and practice school under KRS 164.380 while meeting
the Kentucky educational excellence scholarship curriculum
requirements;
(c) Has a grade point average of 2.5 or above at the end of any academic year
beginning after July 1, 1998, or at the end of the fall academic term for a
student eligible under paragraph (b) 2. of this subsection; and
(d) Is not a convicted felon;
(8) "Eligible postsecondary student" means a citizen, national, or permanent resident of
the United States and Kentucky resident, as determined by the participating
institution in accordance with criteria established by the council for the purposes of
admission and tuition assessment, who:
(a) Earned a KEES award;
(b) Has the required postsecondary GPA and credit hours required under KRS
164.7881;
(c) Has remaining semesters of eligibility under KRS 164.7881;
(d) Is enrolled in a participating institution as a part-time or full-time student; and
(e) Is not a convicted felon;
(9) "Full-time student" means a student enrolled in a postsecondary program of study
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/16/2026 9:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1837
that meets the full-time student requirements of the participating institution in
which the student is enrolled;
(10) "Grade point average" or "GPA" means the grade point average earned by an
eligible student and reported by the high school or participating institution in which
the student was enrolled based on a scale of 4.0 or its equivalent if the high school
or participating institution that the student attends does not use the 4.0 grade scale;
(11) "High school" means any Kentucky public high school, the Gatton Academy of
Mathematics and Science in Kentucky, the Craft Academy for Excellence in
Science and Mathematics, a high school of a model and practice school under KRS
164.380, and any private, parochial, or church school located in Kentucky that has
been certified by the Kentucky Board of Education as voluntarily complying with
curriculum, certification, and textbook standards established by the Kentucky Board
of Education under KRS 156.160;
(12) "KEES" or "Kentucky educational excellence scholarship" means a scholarship
provided under KRS 164.7871 to 164.7885;
(13) "KEES award" means:
(a) For an eligible high school student, the sum of the KEES base amount for
each academic year of high school plus any KEES supplemental amount, as
adjusted pursuant to KRS 164.7881; and
(b) For a student eligible under KRS 164.7879(3)(e), the KEES supplemental
amount as adjusted pursuant to KRS 164.7881;
(14) "KEES award maximum" means the sum of the KEES base amount earned in each
academic year of high school plus any KEES supplemental amount earned;
(15) "KEES base amount" or "base amount" means the amount earned by an eligible
high school student based on the student's GPA pursuant to KRS 164.7879;
(16) "KEES curriculum" means five (5) courses of study, except for students who meet
the criteria of subsection (7)(b)2. of this section, in an academic year as determined
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/16/2026 9:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1837
in accordance with an administrative regulation promulgated by the authority;
(17) "KEES supplemental amount" means the amount earned by an eligible student
based on the student's ACT score pursuant to KRS 164.7879;
(18) "KEES trust fund" means the Wallace G. Wilkinson Kentucky educational
excellence scholarship trust fund;
(19) "On track to graduate" means the number of cumulative credit hours earned as
compared to the number of hours determined by the postsecondary education
institution as necessary to complete a bachelor's degree by the end of eight (8)
academic terms or ten (10) academic terms if a student is enrolled in an
undergraduate program that requires five (5) years of study;
(20) "Participating institution" means:
(a) An "institution" as defined in KRS 164.001 that is eligible to participate in the
federal Pell Grant program, executes a contract with the authority on terms the
authority deems necessary or appropriate for the administration of its
programs, and:
1.[(a)] a.[1.] Is publicly operated;
b.[2.] Is licensed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky and has operated
for at least ten (10) years, offers an associate or baccalaureate
degree program of study not comprised solely of sectarian
instruction, and admits as regular students only high school
graduates, recipients of a High School Equivalency Diploma, or
students transferring from another accredited degree granting
institution; or
c.[3.] Is designated by the authority as an approved out-of-state
institution that offers a degree program in a field of study that is
not offered at any institution in the Commonwealth; and
2.[(b)] Continues to commit financial resources to student financial
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/16/2026 9:29 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1837
assistance programs; or
(b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, the United States Air Force
Academy, the United States Military Academy, the United States Naval
Academy, the United States Coast Guard Academy, or the United States
Merchant Marine Academy, if the academy executes a contract with the
authority on terms the authority deems necessary or appropriate for the
administration of its programs; and
(21) "Part-time student" means a student enrolled in a postsecondary program of study
who does not meet the full-time student requirements of the participating institution
in which the student is enrolled and who is enrolled for at least six (6) credit hours,
or the equivalent for an institution that does not use credit hours.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/16/2026 9:29 AM Jacketed